Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-31.1] Public employers;
defined. For the purposes of this part, "public employer" means
a governmental entity whose employees', beneficiaries', and retirees' health
benefits coverage is provided through the fund. [L 2013, c 268, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next